Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 7
SUPPORT PROCEEDING UNDER CONVENTION

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1993, and this part 7 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2015 resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 7 prior to 2015, consult the 2014 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

INTRODUCTORY COMMENT

This article contains provisions adapted from the Convention that could not be readily integrated into the existing body of Articles 1 through 6. For the most part, extending the coverage of UIFSA (2008) to foreign countries was a satisfactory solution to merge the appropriate Convention terms into this act. In understanding this process, it must be clearly stated that the terms of the Convention are not substantive law.

The Convention is a multilateral treaty which binds the United States and the other Convention countries to assure compliance. As such, it will be the law of the land; but the treaty is not self-executing.

See

, Medellin v. Texas, 552 U.S. 491, 128 S. Ct. 1346, 170 L. Ed. 2d 190 (2008). Thus, the ultimate enforcement of the treaty in the United States is dependent on the key implementing federal law and the enactment of both federal and state legislation which provide the mechanism for enforcing the requirements of the Convention. This act is predicated on the principle that the enactment of UIFSA (2008) in all States and federal jurisdictions will effectively implement the Convention through state law by amending Articles 1 through 6, plus the addition of this article. The treaty, in essence, establishes the framework for a system of international cooperation by emulating the interstate effect of UIFSA for international cases, especially those affected by the Convention.

In relatively few instances, the provisions of the Convention are sufficiently specific that a choice was made between amending UIFSA accordingly, with a disproportionate effect on all support orders enforced under state law, or accommodating potential conflicts by creating a separate article to apply only to Convention support orders. The choice was to draft this article as state law to minimize disruption to interstate support orders, which constitute the vast majority of orders processed under UIFSA. Note that this act is the substantive and procedural state law for: (1) responding to an application for establishment, recognition and enforcement, or modification of a Convention support order; and, (2) initiating an application to a Convention country for similar action.

The four Hague maintenance conventions that preceded the 2007 Convention, and the three prior versions of UIFSA, have common goals. The distinctions between the jurisdictional rules in the common-law tradition in the United States, and the civil law systems in most of the countries that were parties to the earlier maintenance conventions, were obstacles to participation of the United States in any of the multilateral maintenance treaties. As the world has grown smaller and globalization has become the order of the day, reconciling the differences has become more and more important. Understanding the necessity for accommodation has made the task easier. This is not to say easy, as evidenced by the fact that the formal negotiations leading to the final text of the Convention spanned from May, 2003, to November, 2007.

The United States signed the Convention on November 23, 2007 and the Senate gave its advice and consent to ratification in 2010. Enabling federal legislation was enacted on September 29, 2014 which requires all states to enact UIFSA (2008) by the end of 2015. At that point the United States will deposit its instrument of ratification and the Convention will enter into force in the United States.

UIFSA (2008) and the 2007 Convention have far more in common than did former uniform acts and maintenance conventions, and, in fact, many provisions of the Convention are modeled on UIFSA principles. The negotiations demonstrated that it is possible to draft an international convention, which incorporates core UIFSA principles into a system for the establishment and enforcement of child support and spousal-support orders across international borders, and creates an efficient, economical, and expeditious procedure to accomplish these goals. Matters in common, however, go far beyond identical goals. The negotiations provided an opportunity for an extended interchange of ideas about how to adapt legal mechanisms to facilitate child support enforcement between otherwise disparate legal systems.

International cross-border enforcement has been far more important in Western Europe, and more recently, throughout the countries of the European Union than has been the case in the United States. On the other hand, experience with establishment and enforcement of interstate child-support orders in the United States has been building since 1950, and accelerated rapidly with enactment of Title IV-D of the Social Security Act in 1975. Clearly, the issues are far easier to deal with nationally because of the common language, currency, and legal system, and, since 1996, with the Title IV-D requirement that all states enact the same version of UIFSA. In fact, since the advent of UIFSA and Title IV-D, millions of interstate cases have been processed through the child support enforcement system and thousands of support orders from other countries have also been registered and enforced in the United States because UIFSA treated such orders as if they had been entered by one of the states. In the future, in Convention countries, this country's orders will be entitled to similar treatment. The entry into force of the Convention is designed to further improve the process and will most certainly lead in a few years to a substantial increase in international cases, both incoming and outgoing.

To create UIFSA (2008), it was necessary to integrate the texts of UIFSA (2001) and the Convention. This did not present a significant drafting challenge for the most part. By far the most common amendment in Articles 1 through 6 is to substitute "state or foreign country" for the term "state." These simple amendments expanded a majority of this act to cover foreign support orders. In this article statutory directions are given to "a tribunal of this state," and also to a "governmental entity, individual petitioner, support enforcement agency, or a party."

14-5-701. Definitions.

In this part 7:

"Application" means a request under the Convention by an obligee or obligor, or on behalf of a child, made through a central authority for assistance from another central authority.

"Central authority" means the entity designated by the United States or a foreign country described in section 14-5-102 (3.3)(D) to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

"Convention support order" means a support order of a tribunal of a foreign country described in section 14-5-102 (3.3)(D).

"Direct request" means a petition filed by an individual in a tribunal of this state in a proceeding involving an obligee, obligor, or child residing outside the United States.

"Foreign central authority" means the entity designated by a foreign country described in section 14-5-102 (3.3)(D) to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

"Foreign support agreement":

Means an agreement for support in a record that:

Is enforceable as a support order in the country of origin;

Has been:

Formally drawn up or registered as an authentic instrument by a foreign tribunal; or

Authenticated by, or concluded, registered, or filed with a foreign tribunal; and

May be reviewed and modified by a foreign tribunal; and

(B) Includes a maintenance arrangement or authentic instrument under the Convention.

"United States central authority" means the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 561, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

A readily apparent difference between UIFSA (2008) and the Convention is the perceived need for definitions in the former, and the very limited number of definitions in the latter. This act contains twenty-nine definitions in Section 102, and an additional seven for this article. In contrast, the Convention contains only seven official definitions. Some of these are synonyms for definitions in UIFSA, i.e., "creditor and debtor" for "obligor and obligee," and "agreement in writing" for "record."

Subsection (1), "application" refers to the process for an individual obligor or obligee to request assistance from a central authority under the Convention.

Subsections (2) and (5) identify the governmental entities, i.e., central authority, in each contracting country or political subdivisions thereof, that will function as the operating agencies to facilitate contacts between Convention countries. The Convention is a treaty between the countries in which it is in force thus creating mutual obligations. The duties assigned in the Convention to the central authority of each country will be performed according to the choice of each country. It is crucial to recognize that in the United States it will be the Title IV-D agency of each state that will be designated by the U.S. central authority to perform most of the functions specified in the Convention. It appears likely that in many foreign countries the central authority will serve in the role of a clearinghouse, rather than as the operative enforcement entity, while some countries may assign all central authority functions to one agency.

Subsection (3), "Convention support order" narrows the term "foreign support order," as employed in Articles 1 through 6. The provisions in those articles also apply to Convention support orders, but when this act is not congruent with the Convention, support orders under the Convention are subject to this article. This article has no application to a support order from a non-Convention foreign country, as defined in Section 102(5)(A) and (B) or a support order entitled to comity, Section 102(5)(C), except to the extent that a Convention country may request enforcement of a non-Convention support order that has been recognized in the United States under some other procedure,

see

Section 704.

Subsection (4) integrates the "direct request" authorized by the Convention with the provisions for filing a petition in Articles 1 through 6.

The definition in the Convention for "maintenance arrangement" has been rephrased in Subsection (6), and must be read together with Section 710 to understand the process authorized in the Convention.

Convention source: art. 3. Definitions; art. 30. Maintenance arrangements.

Related to Convention: art. 4. Designation of Central Authorities; art. 37. Direct requests to competent authorities.

14-5-702. Applicability.

This part 7 applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of this part 7 is inconsistent with parts 1 through 6 of this article, this part 7 controls.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 562, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

The first sentence definitively states that this article applies only to a proceeding involving a Convention country, as defined in Section 102(5)(D). This article does not generally apply to a support order from a non-Convention foreign country as defined in Section 102(5)(A) and (B) or to a support order entitled to comity. The second sentence resolves a situation in which there is a conflict between a section in this article and a provision in Articles 1 through 6, in which case this article controls.

Related to Convention: art. 1. Object; art. 2. Scope; art. 4. Designation of Central Authorities.

14-5-703. Relationship of state department of human services to United States central authority.

The state department of human services of this state is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the Convention.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 562, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

The Secretary of Health and Human Services has designated the state Title IV-D child support agencies as the governmental entities that will carry out many of the central authority's functions under the Convention. Each state determines which public office or administrative agency will perform the Title IV-D services for child support enforcement. Because the federal government provides a significant subsidy for this effort, the actions of the agency must comply with federal statutes and regulations and the state legislature must enact certain mandatory laws. The relationship is symbiotic in that states choose to participate in the Title IV-D program, and do so by following their own state procedures and legislative enactments that recognize and authorize the state officer or agency to function under these conditions.

Related to Convention: ch. II. Administrative co-operation, arts. 4-8; ch. III. Applications through central authorities, arts. 9-17.

14-5-704. Initiation by state department of human services of support proceeding under Convention.

In a support proceeding under this part 7, the state department of human services of this state shall:

Transmit and receive applications; and

Initiate or facilitate the institution of a proceeding regarding an application in a tribunal of this state.

Establishment of a support order if there is no existing order, including, if necessary, determination of parentage of a child;

Establishment of a support order if recognition of a foreign support order is refused under section 14-5-708 (b)(2), (4), or (9);

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

The following support proceedings are available to an obligee under the Convention:

(1) Recognition or recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order;

(2) Enforcement of a support order issued or recognized in this state;

The following support proceedings are available under the Convention to an obligor against which there is an existing support order:

(1) Recognition of an order suspending or limiting enforcement of an existing support order of a tribunal of this state;

(2) Modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

(3) Modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

A tribunal of this state may not require security, bond, or deposit, however described, to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses in proceedings under the Convention.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 562, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

This section is designed to enable lawyers and non-lawyers to better understand proceedings under the Convention, which itself is written in terminology unfamiliar to legal proceedings in the United States.

Subsection (a) lists the rights and duties of a support enforcement agency.

Subsection (b) lists what rights and duties are available to an obligee, whether the proceeding is inbound from a Convention country or outbound to a Convention country.

In contrast to the general rule in UIFSA, which attempts to maintain something of parity between the obligor and obligee, subsection (c) limits the rights and duties available to an obligor under the Convention. This reflects the equal treatment ideal espoused by UIFSA in Articles 1 through 6, and the pro-obligee philosophy of the Convention. In actual practice, the results may not be that different. Recall that until replaced by UIFSA, an informal subtitle given to URESA by its leading proponents was "The Runaway Pappy Act."

Subsection (d) tracks Convention art. 14 (5).

Convention source: art. 6. Specific functions of Central Authorities; art. 10. Available applications; art. 14. Effective access to procedures.

Related to Convention: ch. II. Administrative co-operation, arts. 4-7; ch. III. Applications through central authorities, arts. 9-17.

14-5-705. Direct request.

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking establishment or modification of a support order or determination of parentage of a child. In the proceeding, the law of this state applies.

A petitioner may file a direct request seeking recognition and enforcement of a support order or support agreement. In the proceeding, sections 14-5-706 through 14-5-713 apply.

In a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a Convention support order or foreign support agreement:

A security, bond, or deposit is not required to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses; and

An obligee or obligor that in the issuing country has benefitted from free legal assistance is entitled to benefit, at least to the same extent, from any free legal assistance provided for by the law of this state under the same circumstances.

A petitioner filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the state child support services agency in the state department of human services.

This part 7 does not prevent the application of laws of this state that provide simplified, more expeditious rules regarding a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order or foreign support agreement.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 563, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Given the long history of open courts in the United States, this section may seem axiomatic, redundant, or unnecessary. In fact, because this principle has not always been universal, it is important to recognize that the Convention confirms that an individual residing in a Convention country may file a petition directly in a tribunal of another Convention country without requesting the assistance of a central authority or a support enforcement agency. Given the variety of legal systems that may be involved under the Convention, this freedom of choice is explicitly protected. A person residing in a Convention county, whether a citizen or a noncitizen of the United States, may apply to a tribunal in the United States for establishment, recognition, and enforcement of a child-support order for enforcement of a spousal support order, for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement, and in some situations, for modification of an existing support order. Of course, the freedom of an individual to petition for relief in a tribunal says nothing about the nature of legal representation, if any, implicit in the right of access to a tribunal, is that representation may be pro se or by private counsel.

See

Section 309.

Subsection (a) provides that an individual party may file a proceeding directly in a tribunal, thus submitting to the jurisdiction of the tribunal and to state law. The object of the proceeding may be establishment of a support order, determination of parentage of a child, or modification of an existing support order.

Subsection (b) recognizes that an individual party may file a proceeding in a tribunal requesting recognition and enforcement of a Convention support order, or a foreign support agreement as defined in Section 710. The party thereby chooses not to seek the services of a central authority or support enforcement agency. Nonetheless, the individual will be affected indirectly by the terms of the Convention because the proceeding is subject to Sections 706 through 713, which are drawn from the Convention. This effect applies to an individual residing in a Convention country and to an individual residing elsewhere who is seeking to enforce a Convention support order.

Subsection (c) contains two provisions drawn from the Convention specifically applicable to a petition for recognition and enforcement of a Convention support order. First, a guarantee of payment of costs may not be required. Second, if the individual has benefited from free legal assistance in a Convention country, that individual is entitled to free legal assistance if it is available in similar circumstances under the law of the responding state.

Under subsection (d) an individual party who files a direct request regarding a Convention support order in a tribunal is not entitled to assistance from the governmental entity, i.e. the support enforcement agency.

Subsection (e) echoes Article 52 of the Convention. An individual party who files a petition in a tribunal may take advantage of any "simplified, more expeditious procedures" which may be available in the requested state, so long as they are "compatible with the protection offered to the parties under articles 23 and 24" of the Convention.

Convention source: art. 14. Effective access to procedures; art. 17. Applications not qualifying under Article 15 or Article 16; art. 37. Direct requests to competent authorities; art. 52, Most effective rule.

Related to Convention: ch. II. Administrative co-operation, arts.4-8; ch. III. Applications through central authorities, arts. 9-17; art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 25. Documents; art. 27. Findings of fact; art. 28. No review of the merits; art. 37. Direct requests to competent authorities; art. 56. Transitional provisions.

14-5-706. Registration of Convention support order.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 7, a party who is an individual or that is a support enforcement agency seeking recognition of a Convention support order shall register the order in this state as provided in part 6 of this article.

Notwithstanding sections 14-5-311 and 14-5-602 (a), a request for registration of a Convention support order must be accompanied by:

A complete text of the support order or an abstract or extract of the support order drawn up by the issuing foreign tribunal, which may be in the form recommended by The Hague Conference on Private International Law;

A record stating that the support order is enforceable in the issuing country;

If the respondent did not appear and was not represented in the proceedings in the issuing country, a record attesting, as appropriate, either that the respondent had proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard or that the respondent had proper notice of the support order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact or law before a tribunal;

A record showing the amount of arrears, if any, and the date the amount was calculated;

A record showing a requirement for automatic adjustment of the amount of support, if any, and the information necessary to make the appropriate calculations; and

If necessary, a record showing the extent to which the applicant received free legal assistance in the issuing country.

A request for registration of a Convention support order may seek recognition and partial enforcement of the order.

A tribunal of this state may vacate the registration of a Convention support order without the filing of a contest under section 14-5-707 only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement of the order would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

The tribunal shall promptly notify the parties of the registration or the order vacating the registration of a Convention support order.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 564, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) integrates the Convention support order into the registration for enforcement procedure set forth in Sections 601 through 608. A state support enforcement agency and a tribunal will use basically the same procedures for a Convention order under this article as would be used in a non-Convention proceeding.

From inception, UIFSA contained detailed provisions for substantive procedures for interstate child- support orders. To facilitate expedited processing, detailed statutory instructions have encouraged uniformity of legal documents. The Convention follows this precedent. The list of documents to be provided, however, is somewhat different than the documents described in Sections 311 and 602. In order to ensure that a document satisfying the requirements of the Convention will be accepted by a support enforcement agency or tribunal, subsection (a) identifies the documents required to accompany an application under the Convention.

Several of the required documents may be unfamiliar in the United States, e.g., the authority to provide an abstract or an extract of an order rather than the complete text of an order under paragraph (b)(1); the requirement for a statement of enforceability of the order under paragraph (b)(2); proof that the respondent had proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard if the respondent did not appear and was not represented under (b)(3); and proof that the applicant received free legal assistance in the issuing country under paragraph (b)(6).

Subsection (c) provides that a petitioner may request only partial enforcement of a support order,

see

Section 709.

infra

, which speaks to partial enforcement by a tribunal.

Subsections (d) and (e) authorize action by a tribunal available under the Convention that may not be available under other state law. Subsection (d) permits the tribunal to vacate registration, acting on its own motion, under certain exceptional circumstances, and subsection (e) requires that notice be promptly provided of any such order vacating registration. Such

ex officio

review, if used to refuse recognition of an order, is in tension with the core UIFSA policy of requiring recognition. In any event, the subsections are not a vehicle for a review of the merits of the decision. An example would be useful here, but there is none in the Explanatory Report to the Convention, just the negative reference that a country could not use this to enforce a policy against ordering support for a child born out of wedlock. http://www.hcch.net/upload/expl38.pdf. Perhaps an example could be that the court might reject an application to establish support from a biological parent whose rights had been terminated and the child was subsequently adopted.

Convention source: art. 25. Documents; art. 21. Severability and partial recognition and enforcement; art. 22. Grounds for refusing recognition and enforcement; art. 23. Procedure on an application for recognition and enforcement; art. 25. Documents.

Related to Convention: art. 11. Application contents; art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement.

14-5-707. Contest of registered Convention support order.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 7, sections 14-5-605 through 14-5-608 apply to a contest of a registered Convention support order.

A party contesting a registered Convention support order shall file a contest not later than thirty days after notice of the registration, but if the contesting party does not reside in the United States, the contest must be filed not later than sixty days after notice of the registration.

If the nonregistering party fails to contest the registered Convention support order by the time specified in subsection (b), the order is enforceable.

A contest of a registered Convention support order may be based only on grounds set forth in section 14-5-708. The contesting party bears the burden of proof.

In a contest of a registered Convention support order, a tribunal of this state:

Is bound by the findings of fact on which the foreign tribunal based its jurisdiction; and

May not review the merits of the order.

A tribunal of this state deciding a contest of a registered Convention support order shall promptly notify the parties of its decision.

A challenge or appeal, if any, does not stay the enforcement of a Convention support order unless there are exceptional circumstances.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire part R&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 565, § 32, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) states the general rule that a contest of a registration is generally governed by Sections 605 through 608,

supra

. Subsection (b), however, establishes separate, longer time frames to contest the registration of a Convention support order than for filing a contest as established in Section 605. If notice of contest is to be given in the United States, the time difference is relatively modest, i.e., 30 days instead of 20. A more significant difference is created for out-of-country notice, i.e., 60 days instead of 20. Arguably this takes into account that providing notice to a party in a foreign country may take longer than ordinarily expected. In any event, the longer time frames are specifically required in connection with a Convention order. Note that while the principle may always be true that notice to a party situated in a foreign country may take longer, the additional times for notice apply only to an order subject to the Convention.

Subsections (c)-(g) transform Convention language into UIFSA terminology. Subsection (g), which prohibits a stay in enforcement pending a challenge or appeal except in exceptional circumstances, is another substantive provision required by the Convention. It does not apply in non-Convention cases, in which domestic law determines whether a stay of enforcement should be granted pending an appeal or other challenge.

Convention source: art. 23. Procedure on an application for recognition and enforcement; art. 27. Findings of fact; art. 28. No review of the merits.

Related to Convention: art. 20. Bases for recognition and enforcement; art. 21. Severability and partial recognition and enforcement; art. 23. Procedure on an application for recognition and enforcement; art. 27. Findings of fact; art. 28. No review of the merits.